Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-829
Authority; rules and regulations for use of project; designate
agent.

The authority may establish rules and regulations
for the use of a project or any portion thereof and designate an
eligible institution as its agent to establish rules and regulations
for the use of a project undertaken by such eligible institution.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2926;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 26;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1726;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 29.